lexc/verb/enhuige4ik.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot 
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+ +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§ae§ §eo§ §szorelol§ §sj§ §igeoe§ §l§ §igeoue§ §igeuo§
§igeoo§ 
       
LEXICON Root
Verb;
Prefigekoto;
Verb1;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;


LEXICON Verb1
bennerejlik:bennerejel AddVerb32;
bennerejlik:bennerejl AddVerb2;
bennerejlik:bennerejle AddVerb20;
bennerejlik:bennerejle AddVerb40;
bennerejlik:bennerejlet AddVerb3;
bentrejlik:bentrejel AddVerb32;
bentrejlik:bentrejl AddVerb2;
bentrejlik:bentrejle AddVerb20;
bentrejlik:bentrejle AddVerb40;
bentrejlik:bentrejlet AddVerb3;


!ír
!írhat  potential
!irathat imper potential
!irat imper
!irattattat imper imper
!irjon command
!írhasson
!írogattathat rep imper pot
!íratgathat
!írogattatgat
!Irni
!írnék, írnál .. írnának cond conditional
! írjak írjon írj  command

!If there is only one level endings come from case1
!If there is more than on level, endings come from case
!

LEXICON AddVerb1
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case1;

LEXICON Case1
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§ae§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§eo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !

LEXICON AddVerb2
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case2;

LEXICON Case2
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§ae§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§eo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !

LEXICON AddVerb200
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case200;

LEXICON Case200
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok

LEXICON AddVerb2a
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case2a;

LEXICON Case2a
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§ae§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§eo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !

LEXICON AddVerb2aoe
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case2aoe;

LEXICON Case2aoe
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§ae§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeo§t§igeo§k  #;    ! tek/tok
!+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeoe§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !


LEXICON AddVerb3oe
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case3oe;

LEXICON Case3oe
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
!+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te


LEXICON AddVerb3
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case3;

LEXICON Case3
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
!+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te

LEXICON AddVerb5
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case5;

LEXICON Verb
botlik:botl AddVerb1;
botlik:botla AddVerb5;
botlik:botlot AddVerb3;
csetlik:csetl AddVerb2;
csetlik:csetlet AddVerb3;
csömörlik:csömörl AddVerb2aoe; ! def, indef
csömörlik:csömörlöt AddVerb3oe; ! past
fehérlik:fehérl AddVerb2;
fehérlik:fehérlet AddVerb3;
fejlik:fejl AddVerb2;
feslik:fesl AddVerb2;
feslik:feslet AddVerb3;
fénylik:fényl AddVerb2;
fénylik:fénylet AddVerb3;
hanyatlik:hanyatl AddVerb1;
hanyatlik:hanyatla AddVerb5;
hanyatlik:hanyatlot AddVerb3;
hírlik:hírl AddVerb2;
hírlik:hírlet AddVerb3;
kereklik:kerekl AddVerb2;
kereklik:kereklet AddVerb3;
kotlik:kotl AddVerb1;
kotlik:kotla AddVerb5;
kotlik:kotlot AddVerb3;
kéklik:kékl AddVerb2;
kéklik:kéklet AddVerb3;
porlik:porl AddVerb1;
porlik:porla AddVerb5;
porlik:porlot AddVerb3;
párlik:párl AddVerb1;
párlik:párla AddVerb5;
párlik:párlot AddVerb3;
rejlik:rejl AddVerb2;
rejlik:rejlet AddVerb3;
rémlik:réml AddVerb2;
rémlik:rémlet AddVerb3;
szembeötlik:szembeötl AddVerb2aoe;
szembeötlik:szembeötlöt AddVerb3oe;
szivárványlik:szivárványl AddVerb1;
szivárványlik:szivárványla AddVerb5;
szivárványlik:szivárványlot AddVerb3;
szülemlik:szüleml AddVerb2a;
szülemlik:szülemlet AddVerb3;
szüremlik:szüreml AddVerb2a;
szüremlik:szüremlet AddVerb3;
sárlik:sárl AddVerb1;
sárlik:sárla AddVerb5;
sárlik:sárlot AddVerb3;
sínylik:sínyl AddVerb2a;
sínylik:sínylet AddVerb3;
sötétlik:sötétl AddVerb2a;
sötétlik:sötétlet AddVerb3;
türemlik:türeml AddVerb2a;
türemlik:türemlet AddVerb3;
vedlik:vedl AddVerb200;
vedlik:vedl AddVerb2;
vedlik:vedlet AddVerb3;
örvénylik:örvényl AddVerb2;
örvénylik:örvénylet AddVerb3;
ötlik:ötl AddVerb2aoe;
ötlik:ötlöt AddVerb3oe;
